Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 10 Voluntary Liquidation

19-10-1.
Power to liquidate — Appointment of agent.

Any financial institution or credit union that is solvent may, subject to the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, liquidate and be closed by a vote of its stockholders owning two thirds (2/3) of its capital stock or, in the case of a mutually owned savings bank, two thirds (2/3) of its depositors or, in the case of credit unions, two thirds (2/3) of its members. For the purpose of closing the affairs of any financial institution or credit union, the directors shall submit a plan of liquidation to the director, or the director’s designee, for approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 48.

19-10-2.
Notice of liquidation.

Whenever a vote is taken to go into liquidation, it shall be the duty of the board of directors or trustees to cause notice of this fact to be certified, under the seal of the financial institution or credit union, by its president, cashier, or treasurer, to the director, or the director’s designee. If the director, or the director’s designee, approves of the act of the financial institution or credit union, he or she shall certify the decision upon the certificate setting forth the vote of the financial institution or credit union. The financial institution or credit union shall then publish a notice setting forth the vote and notifying creditors to present their claims against the financial institution or credit union for payment, which notice shall be published once each week for eight (8) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in which the financial institution or credit union is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 48.

19-10-3.
Application of receivership provisions — Powers of court.

During the period of the liquidation, the financial institution or credit union shall be subject to the same provisions provided in this title for the regulation of financial institutions or credit unions in the hands of receivers. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the jurisdiction of the superior court sitting in equity over the financial institution or credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 48.

19-10-4.
Delivery of unclaimed funds and property to general treasurer.

Whenever the final dividend in liquidation shall be declared by any receiver or officer or agent of any financial institution or credit union, now or hereafter in the hands of a receiver or officer or agent for the purposes of liquidation, and two (2) years shall elapse from the time of the commencement of payment of that dividend, or whenever no dividend has been declared by the receiver of any insolvent financial institution or credit union within three (3) years of the commencement of receivership, it shall be lawful for any receiver or officer or agent, at any time thereafter, upon the allowance of his or her account by the superior court, or in the case of voluntary liquidation upon the allowance by the financial institution or credit union, and upon the order of the court or the financial institution or credit union, to pay over all the funds of the financial institution or credit union remaining in his or her hands, whether arising from unclaimed dividends or otherwise, to the general treasurer of this state to be deposited in the general treasury and to deliver all the remaining property of the financial institution or credit union to the general treasurer, upon his or her receipt for it and upon payment and delivery, the powers, obligations, duties, and liabilities of the receiver or officer or agent shall terminate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 48.

19-10-5.
Advertisement and payment of unclaimed funds.

It shall be the duty of the receiver or officer or agent at the time of payment to deliver to the general treasurer a list of the unclaimed deposits and dividends in the financial institution or credit union, with the names of the parties entitled to the deposits and dividends, as shown by the books of the financial institution or credit union. Any person claiming any unclaimed dividend shall be entitled to payment of any money in the general treasury not otherwise appropriated on producing evidence satisfactory to the general treasurer of the validity of his or her claim. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her order or orders on the general treasurer in favor of the claimant on the presentation of the proper vouchers. It shall be the duty of the general treasurer to advertise each year, during the period of three (3) years from and after receiving the funds of the financial institution or credit union, a list of the unclaimed dividends in these financial institutions or credit unions and of the persons supposed to be entitled to the unclaimed dividends once a week, at least, for three (3) successive weeks, in one or more of the public newspapers published in the city or town in which the financial institution or credit union is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 48.

19-10-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 48.